Rhode Island, session 2025, SB500.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-15 of the General Laws entitled "Water Supply" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-15-13. Maintenance, operation and delivery of water services..
Any water supplier, defined pursuant to § 39-15.1-2, shall be responsible for the
maintenance, operation, and delivery of water to the lot line of each individual parcel of land
contained within a residential subdivision, including any and all costs associated with a pumping
station not contained within the residential subdivision, and for any pumping station not contained
on school property delivering water to a school. For purposes of this section, any condominium or
multi-family parcel of land shall not constitute a residential subdivision.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001864
========